Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2631
Attorney General; reciprocal agreements; authorized.

The Attorney General shall have the power and authority to enter into reciprocal agreements with the duly authorized representatives of other jurisdictions, federal or state, for the exchange of information on a cooperative basis which may assist in the proper administration of the Competitive Livestock Markets Act.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 31.